Hawaii statutes.
§15-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Absentee ballot" means a ballot as
defined in section 11-1 used in absentee voting.

"Absentee polling place" means an
office or other suitable facility designated by the respective clerks for the
conduct of absentee voting and the processing of absentee ballots.

"Electronic transmission" means the
transmission of a blank or voted ballot by facsimile, electronic mail delivery,
or the utilization of an online absentee ballot delivery and return system that
may include the ability to mark the ballot. "Invalid ballot"
means any absentee ballot which does not meet the requirements for a ballot to
be counted as listed in section 15-9.

"Voter in a remote area" means any
registered voter who resides ten miles or more from the voter's designated
polling place by the most direct route for public travel. [L 1975, c 36, pt of
§3; am L 1976, c 106, §4(1); gen ch 1985; am L 2016 c 168, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next